Rhode Island, session 2025, SB914.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-3-48.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration
of Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-48.1. Plates for recipients of Distinguished Service Cross.
(a) The administrator of motor vehicles is empowered to make available to recipients of
the United States Army Distinguished Service Cross medal a special motor vehicle registration
plate for any motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile or commercial vehicle having
a gross weight of twelve thousand pounds (12,000 lbs.) or less, indicating the owner as a recipient
of the Distinguished Service Cross. The applicant shall be required to pay a registration fee and a
transfer charge of five dollars ($5.00) for the plate.
(b) The plate shall contain the words “Distinguished Service Cross” across the top of the
plate, shall bear an insignia for the distinguished service cross, and then a numeral or numerals.
(c) Upon the death of the holder of any “Distinguished Service Cross” plate, the plate shall
be transferred to the surviving spouse for the spouse’s lifetime or until remarriage.
(d) The applicant shall not be required to pay a registration fee or service charge for the
plates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC002612/SUB A
========